Utah statutes.
31A-30-202.5.   Insurer participation in defined contribution arrangement
market.
(1)  A small employer carrier who chooses to participate in the defined
contribution arrangement market:
(a)  shall offer the defined contribution arrangement health benefit plans
required by Section 31A-30-205;
(b)  may:
(i)  offer additional defined contribution arrangement health benefit plans in
the Health Insurance Exchange as permitted by Section 31A-30-205;
(ii)  offer a defined benefit plan in the Health Insurance Exchange if the
small employer carrier offers a defined contribution arrangement health
benefit plan that is actuarially equivalent to the defined benefit plan that
is offered in the Health Insurance Exchange; and
(iii)  continue to offer defined benefit plans outside of the Health Insurance
Exchange and the defined contribution arrangement market, if the carrier uses
the same rating and underwriting practices in both the defined contribution
arrangement market in the Health Insurance Exchange and the defined benefit
market outside the Health Insurance Exchange.
(2)  A carrier that does not elect to participate in the defined contribution
arrangement market by January 1, 2011, may not participate in the defined
contribution arrangement market in the Health Insurance Exchange until January
1, 2013.
